Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2610.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 3003.26. Electronic Tax Lien Filing and Centralized Repository.--(a) Commonwealth taxes administered by the department shall be a lien upon the property, franchises and rights to property, real and personal, tangible and intangible, including after-acquired property, of a corporation, association 12345678910111213141516171819202122 or person upon the posting of the liability under subsection (g) and shall be considered recorded and, unless otherwise provided in this act, have priority from that point in time. The lien shall be a statutory lien, encumbering the property, franchises and rights to the property throughout this Commonwealth without the need for the lien to be reduced to judgment, filed with a county prothonotary or revived.(b) If the property, franchises and rights to property of a corporation, association or person are sold at a judicial sale, all taxes due to the Commonwealth shall be allowed and fully paid out of the proceeds of the sale before any other obligation, judgment, mortgage, claim or lien, including real estate taxes and local and municipal claims, and excepting costs of the sale and of the writ upon which the sale was made, but shall be subordinate to mortgages or other liens, including real estate taxes and local and municipal claims which had already been established by statute, or existing and duly recorded or entered of record prior to the posting of the tax lien on the repository established under subsection (g).(c) A judicial sale from a senior priority claim shall divest a Commonwealth tax lien from the property actually sold at that sale only to the extent the Commonwealth tax lien remains unpaid after all distributions have been made, but the Commonwealth tax lien shall, in all other respects, continue to encumber any and all property the corporation, association or person owns that was not included in the judicial sale, including after-acquired property, until such time as the Commonwealth tax lien is satisfied in its entirety.(d) All liens filed by the department shall be Commonwealth tax liens and nothing in this section shall be construed to 20260HB2610PN3611 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 prohibit the department, at its discretion, from releasing a Commonwealth tax lien upon receipt of adequate consideration.(e) Liens imposed under Article XXI shall arise as of the date of death and attach to the decedent's real property and need not be included in the repository established under this section. The lien shall remain until the taxes and interest are paid in full or until the lien is released under Article XXI.(f) The department is not required to file a Commonwealth tax lien with a prothonotary of a county in order for the department to collect on the lien, through any method available at law, except for a writ of execution filed by the Commonwealth.(g) The department shall maintain a searchable centralized repository of all Commonwealth tax liens due and owing to the Commonwealth. The repository shall be posted to the department's publicly accessible Internet website. Liabilities due to the Commonwealth for taxes administered by the department may be posted to the repository within seven days of the settlement, determination or assessment becoming final. The department is not required to refile or revive a Commonwealth tax lien. The repository shall be updated no less than once every seven days. The publication of the repository and disclosure of information contained in the repository shall be used only for official purposes under section 731 of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.343, No.176), known as "The Fiscal Code."(h) (1) In order for the Commonwealth to collect on a Commonwealth tax lien by executing on property, unless otherwise provided by law, the Commonwealth tax lien must be filed of record with the prothonotary of the county in which the property or rights to property the department seeks to execute upon is 20260HB2610PN3611 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 located. The department may, at any time, transmit to the prothonotary of the applicable county in which the property the department seeks to execute upon is located, a certified copy of the lien posted on the repository, to be entered of record by the prothonotary and indexed as judgments are now indexed, upon which record is lawful for writs of execution to be directly issued without the issuance and prosecution to judgment of writs of scire facias: Provided, that not less than ten days before the issuance of execution on the lien, notice of the filing and effect of the lien shall be sent by first class and registered or certified mail to the taxpayer's last known post office address.(2) When the department seeks to enforce a Commonwealth tax lien on an out-of-State taxpayer or against out-of-State property of any liable taxpayer, the department shall record the tax lien in the judgment of index of a prothonotary. As a result of the recording, the tax lien shall be entitled to full faith and credit in this Commonwealth and shall be enforceable as judgments are for out-of-State enforcement.(3) A prothonotary is not required as a condition precedent to the entry of the lien, payment of the costs incident to the entry.(4) The indexing and filing of the Commonwealth tax lien by the prothonotary does not change or otherwise affect the priority status of the lien unless otherwise provided in this act.(5) Nothing in this section shall be construed to require the department to file a Commonwealth tax lien in order to proceed with a wage garnishment under section 3003.15 or a bank attachment under section 3003.22.20260HB2610PN3611 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) A prothonotary who willfully fails to carry out a duty imposed by this section commits a misdemeanor and shall, upon conviction, be sentenced to pay a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000) and costs of prosecution or to undergo imprisonment for a term not exceeding one year, or both.(j) (1) Beginning in fiscal year 2027-2028 and each fiscal year thereafter, the department shall remit payment to each office of the prothonotary or its equivalent civil judgment index custodian office in an amount equal to the average of the department's cumulative Commonwealth tax lien filing fee costs filed in the respective county from fiscal years 2024-2025, 2025-2026 and 2026-2027.(2) The department's payment shall be used by the prothonotary for the services provided to other citizens that request assistance from the office of prothonotary.Section 2. Repeals are as follows:(1) The General Assembly declares that the repeal under paragraph (2) is necessary to effectuate the addition of section 3003.26 of the act.(2) Section 213 of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.343, No.176), known as The Fiscal Code, is repealed.Section 3. A tax lien of the Commonwealth created prior to January 1, 2027 2028, shall not be impaired, shall remain in full force and effect and shall retain the priority under the provision of law imposing the tax lien without the necessity of refiling or revival.Section 4. This act shall take effect January 1, 2028.20260HB2610PN3611 - 5 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627